Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB669.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Notwithstanding the requirement in KRS 158.070 that the student
instructional year be not less than 170 student attendance days and any other statute or
administrative regulation to the contrary, a school which had one or more attendance
day's that were planned in a school calendar during the month of September 2024 but was
cancelled due to dangers posed by criminal activity may be granted a waiver and receive
credit for those days. To request a waiver, a school district shall submit to the
commissioner of education evidence of school closings and evidence that the closings
were due to dangers posed by criminal activity. A waiver request shall be submitted by
May 1, 2025, and may be for closures of specific schools or of the entire school district.
Upon submission of the evidence, the commissioner of education shall grant the waiver.
Section 2. Whereas student attendance day waivers impact the allocation of
school resources for the current school year, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
BR190200.100 - 1902 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed